trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 18607
	Sdefs: 86
	Paradigms: 492
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new2 apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new3

-->

<!--
        procezita per:
apertium-dixtools format apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new
apertium-dixtools sort -ignorecase -alignMonodix -stripEmptyLines -group n,adj,adjadv,adv,np,np_symbol,cnjadv,cnjadv_symbol,pr,vblex,n_symbol,adj_symbol,adv_symbol,pr_symbol,preadv,ij,vbmod,vbhaver,cnjcoo,cnjcoo_symbol,predet,predet_symbol,cnjsub,cnjsub_symbol,prn_symbol,vbser,num,num_symbol,det,det_symbol,rel apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new2
apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new2 apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix.new3
-->


<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÃÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÕŒÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõœøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭąĄčČćĆđĐęĘłŁŀĿńŃőŐřšŠśŚžŽźŹżŻÆæØøÅåăĂşșȘțȚıİğĞ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="nomi" /> 
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="percent" /> 
    <sdef n="ciph" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="unc" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<pardef n="ö">
  <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ü">
  <e>       <p><l>ü</l>         <r>ü</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!--
    <pardef n="romana(1)">
      <e><i>I</i></e>
      <e><i>II</i></e>
      <e><i>III</i></e>
      <e><i>IV</i></e>
      <e><i>V</i></e>
      <e><i>VI</i></e>
      <e><i>VII</i></e>
      <e><i>VIII</i></e>
      <e><i>IX</i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="romana(2)">
      <e><i></i></e>
      <e><i></i><par n="romana(1)"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="romana(3)">
      <e><i></i><par n="romana(1)"/></e>
      <e><i>X</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>XX</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>XXX</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>XL</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>L</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>LX</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>LXX</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>LXXX</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
      <e><i>XC</i><par n="romana(2)"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aC">
      <e><i></i></e>
      <e><i>aC</i></e>
      <e><i>dC</i></e>
      <e><i>AD</i></e>
      <e><i>a.C</i></e>
      <e><i>d.C</i></e>
      <e><i>A.D</i></e>
      <e><i>a.<b/>C</i></e>
      <e><i>d.<b/>C</i></e>
      <e><i>A.<b/>D</i></e>
    </pardef>
-->

<pardef n="S__anant_pronominals">
      
  <e>       <p><l>-me</l>       <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nos</l>      <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-se</l>       <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-te</l>       <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-vos</l>      <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    
<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>’</l>         <r>’<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ciph"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!--Paradigmes ADJECTIUS -->

<!--paradigmes nous adj -->
<pardef n="lesbian/a__adj">

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/iri__adj">

  <e>       <p><l>íries</l>     <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íria</l>      <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iris</l>      <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iri</l>       <r>iri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     
</pardef>

<pardef n="boh/emi__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>èmies</l>     <r>emi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>èmia</l>      <r>emi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>emis</l>      <r>emi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>emi</l>       <r>emi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="contempor/ani__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ànies</l>     <r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ània</l>      <r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anis</l>      <r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ani</l>       <r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--  <e>       <p><l>àniament</l>  <r>ani<s n="adv"/></r></p></e> -->
</pardef>
<pardef n="afortuna/t__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--  <e>       <p><l>adament</l>   <r>t<s n="adv"/></r></p></e> -->
</pardef>
<pardef n="aliment/ós__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>oses</l>      <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osa</l>       <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osos</l>      <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ós</l>        <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="aigualit">        <i>aiguali</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amorós">          <i>amor</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aproximat">       <i>aproxima</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="benvolgut">       <i>benvolgu</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blanquinós">      <i>blanquin</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bohemi">          <i>boh</i><par n="boh/emi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cenyit">          <i>cenyi</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="contemporani">    <i>contempor</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="coratjós">        <i>coratj</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cutani">          <i>cut</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="definit">         <i>defini</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desconegut">      <i>desconegu</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desprevingut">    <i>desprevingu</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="educat">          <i>educa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
    <e><i>segle<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><par n="atletisme__n"/></e>
    <e><i>segle<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><i><b/></i><par n="aC"/><par n="atletisme__n"/></e>
    <e><i>segles<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><i><b/>i<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><par n="afores__n"/></e>
    <e><i>segles<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><i><b/>i<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><i><b/></i><par n="aC"/><par n="afores__n"/></e>
    <e><i>segles<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><i>-</i><par n="romana(3)"/><par n="afores__n"/></e>
    <e><i>segles<b/></i><par n="romana(3)"/><i>-</i><par n="romana(3)"/><i><b/></i><par n="aC"/><par n="afores__n"/></e>
<e lm="encongit">        <i>encongi</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="escarrabillat">   <i>escarrabilla</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="espinós">         <i>espin</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="esponjós">        <i>esponj</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="espontani">       <i>espont</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exagerat">        <i>exagera</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="got">             <i>go</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="immotivat">       <i>immotiva</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="indisposat">      <i>indisposa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="instantani">      <i>instant</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="malenconiós">     <i>malenconi</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="malforjat">       <i>malforja</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mediterrani">     <i>mediterr</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="momentani">       <i>moment</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="obstinat">        <i>obstina</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pesat">           <i>pesa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pietós">          <i>piet</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="presumptuós">     <i>presumptu</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prolongat">       <i>prolonga</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="refinat">         <i>refina</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="siri">            <i>s</i><par n="s/iri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="simultani">       <i>simult</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="subdesenvolupat"> <i>subdesenvolupa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="subterrani">      <i>subterr</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ultraviolat">     <i>ultraviola</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vanitós">         <i>vanit</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vermellós">       <i>vermell</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vigorós">         <i>vigor</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="D">               <i>D</i><par n="ö"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pöttering">       <i>P</i><par n="ö"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
 <e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
 <e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
